test/src/gt-norm-yamls/N-askekin_gt-norm.yaml
Config:
  hfst:
    Gen: ../../../src/generator-gt-norm.hfst
    Morph: ../../../src/aANlyser-gt-norm.hfst
  xerox:
    Gen: ../../../src/generator-gt-norm.xfst
    Morph: ../../../src/aANlyser-gt-norm.xfst
    App: lookup

Tests:
  
  Noun - askêkinw - ok : # -m inanimate noun, rawhide
     askêkin+N+IN+Sg: askêkin
     askêkin+N+IN+Sg+Px1Sg: nitaskêkin
     askêkin+N+IN+Sg+Px2Sg: kitaskêkin
     askêkin+N+IN+Sg+Px1Pl: nitaskêkinonân
     askêkin+N+IN+Sg+Px12Pl: kitaskêkinonaw
     askêkin+N+IN+Sg+Px2Pl: kitaskêkinowâw
     askêkin+N+IN+Sg+Px3Sg: otaskêkin
     askêkin+N+IN+Sg+Px3Pl: otaskêkinowâw
     askêkin+N+IN+Sg+Px4Pl: otaskêkinoyiw
     
     askêkin+N+IN+Pl: askêkinwa
     askêkin+N+IN+Pl+Px1Sg: nitaskêkinwa
     askêkin+N+IN+Pl+Px2Sg: kitaskêkinwa
     askêkin+N+IN+Pl+Px1Pl: nitaskêkinonâna
     askêkin+N+IN+Pl+Px12Pl: kitaskêkinonawa
     askêkin+N+IN+Pl+Px2Pl: kitaskêkinowâwa
     askêkin+N+IN+Pl+Px3Sg: otaskêkinwa
     askêkin+N+IN+Pl+Px3Pl: otaskêkinowâwa
     askêkin+N+IN+Pl+Px4Pl: otaskêkinoyiwa
     
     askêkin+N+IN+Loc: askêkinohk
     askêkin+N+IN+Px1Sg+Loc: nitaskêkinohk
     askêkin+N+IN+Px2Sg+Loc: kitaskêkinohk
     askêkin+N+IN+Px1Pl+Loc: nitaskêkinonâhk
     askêkin+N+IN+Px12Pl+Loc: kitaskêkinonâhk
     askêkin+N+IN+Px2Pl+Loc: kitaskêkinowâhk
     askêkin+N+IN+Px3Sg+Loc: otaskêkinohk
     askêkin+N+IN+Px3Pl+Loc: otaskêkinowâhk
     askêkin+N+IN+Px4Pl+Loc: otaskêkinoyihk
     
     askêkin+N+IN+Der/Dim+N+IN+Sg: [askêkinos, askêkinosis]
     askêkin+N+IN+Der/Dim+N+IN+Pl: [askêkinosa, askêkinosisa]
     askêkin+N+IN+Der/Dim+N+IN+Loc: [askêkinosihk, askêkinosisihk]
     askêkin+N+IN+Der/Dim+N+IN+Sg+Px1Sg: [nicaskêkinos, nicaskêkinosis]
     askêkin+N+IN+Der/Dim+N+IN+Sg+Px2Sg: [kicaskêkinos, kicaskêkinosis]
     askêkin+N+IN+Der/Dim+N+IN+Sg+Px3Sg: [ocaskêkinos, ocaskêkinosis]
     askêkin+N+IN+Der/Dim+N+IN+Sg+Px4Sg: [ocaskêkinosiyiw, ocaskêkinosisiyiw]
